District of Columbia statutes.
16-571.01

Enforcement of support orders by attachment or garnishment.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, a notice or order to withhold issued to enforce a support order pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 2 of Title 46 shall have priority over any other legal process and shall be implemented according to the procedures, limitations, and requirements of subchapter I of Chapter 2 of Title 46.

May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-100, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1886
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 111(a)(1), 56 DCR 1117
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-200, November 17, 2005, 52 DCR 10490).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(a) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-167, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7648).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Temporary Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-42, December 10, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 11038).
D.C. Law 17-353 substituted “subchapter I of Chapter 2” for “Subchapter I of Chapter 2” and substituted “subchapter I of Chapter 2 of Title 46” for “the act”.